Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1016.
do enact as follows:AB1016,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1016,26Section 2. 20.437 (2) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1016,2,10720.437 (2) (d) Child care training and technical assistance. The amounts in 8the schedule for child care training and technical assistance contracts under s. 949.137 (4) that focus on workforce training for child care providers and prospective 10providers.AB1016,2,1111